Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,119.01
Income tax form; contribution to Wildlife Conservation Fund.

The Tax Commissioner shall include on the individual income tax return form space in which the individual taxpayer may, if a refund is due, designate one dollar or a greater amount of such refund as a contribution to the Wildlife Conservation Fund created in section 37-811.

Laws 1984, LB 466, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 27;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 408;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 19.